Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 26.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8926
Final disciplinary action; fines.

(1) Upon issuance of a final disciplinary action against a person who knowingly and intentionally violates any provision of section 71-8925 other than as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall assess a fine of one thousand dollars against such person. For each subsequent final disciplinary action for violation of such section issued by the department against such person, the department shall assess a fine of one thousand dollars plus one thousand dollars for each final disciplinary action for violation of such section previously issued against such person, not to exceed ten thousand dollars.

(2) Upon issuance of a final disciplinary action against a person who fails to provide an authorized person the right of entry provided in section 71-8925, the department shall assess a fine of five hundred dollars against such person. For each subsequent final disciplinary action for such failure issued against such person, the department shall assess a fine equal to one thousand dollars times the number of such disciplinary actions, not to exceed ten thousand dollars.

(3) All fines collected under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 26.